Hawaii statutes.
§803-24 War vessels excepted. Nothing
contained within sections 803-21 to 803-23, shall be so construed as to apply
to ships of war, or other vessels commanded by officers bearing the commissions
of foreign states, and not subject to search by the law and usage of nations.
[PC 1869, c 66, §13; RL 1925, §857; RL 1935, §1757; RL 1945, §10715; RL 1955,
§255-15; HRS §708-24; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next